District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.03a

Prohibited acts D; penalties.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly open or maintain any place to manufacture, distribute, or store for the purpose of manufacture or distribution a narcotic or abusive drug.

(b)

Any person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not less than 5 years nor more than 25 years, fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 411
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-138, § 2(e), 37 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 252(f), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 33-543a.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 252(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Mayor to implement public information program: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 48-901.02.

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.